New York, session 2025-2026, A5676.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 2 of subsection (a) of 2 section 2504 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 370 of the laws 3 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (B) the city of New York, a public corporation or public authority, in 5 connection with the construction of electrical generating and trans- 6 mission facilities or construction, reconstruction, extensions [and] or 7 additions of light rail or heavy rail rapid transit [and] , commuter 8 railroads, bus facilities, bridges, tunnels, central business district 9 tolling facilities, and facilities related to or ancillary to any of the 10 foregoing. For the purposes of this section, light rail or heavy rail 11 rapid transit, commuter railroads, bus facilities, bridges, tunnels, 12 central business district tolling facilities, and facilities related to 13 or ancillary to any of the foregoing refer to projects delivered by the 14 metropolitan transportation authority and its subsidiaries and affil- 15 iates that are defined as "transportation facilities" in subdivision 16 seventeen of section twelve hundred sixty-one of the public authorities 17 law, or "project" as defined in subdivision six of section five hundred 18 fifty-one of the public authorities law, 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03598-02-5